Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4837.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 17771. A pharmacist may make ivermectin available without a prescription in such a manner as the pharmacist considers appropriate. Sec. 17771a. A pharmacist or pharmacy engaged in the business of selling drugs at retail may make ivermectin available for over-the-counter sale in oral, tablet, or topical form, if both of the following are met: (a) The drug is manufactured in accordance with good manufacturing practices. (b) The drug's packaging is clearly labeled with dosage instructions, contraindications, and safety information.